Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.530

Crime information center—Cost of terminal facilities.

The cost of additional terminal facilities necessary to gain access to the Washington state crime information center shall be borne by the respective agencies operating the terminal facilities.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 27 s 4.]